Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.013

Trust creation—Allowable purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve.

[ 2011 c 327 s 18.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.